District of Columbia statutes.
44-105.09

Abuse, neglect, and exploitation.

(a)

An ALR shall develop and implement policies and procedures prohibiting abuse, neglect, and exploitation of residents.

(b)

(1)

An ALR, employee of an ALR, or other person who believes that a resident has been subjected to abuse, neglect, or exploitation shall report the alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation immediately to the assisted living administrator who shall take appropriate action to protect the resident. The ALR shall report any allegation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation brought to its attention to the Mayor and the Adult Protective Services Program, administered by the Family Services Administration of the Department of Human Development.

(2)

An ALR or employee of an ALR may be subject to a penalty imposed by the Mayor for failure to report an alleged incident of abuse, neglect, or exploitation pursuant to Chapter 19 of Title 7.

(3)

An ALR shall thoroughly investigate any allegation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation and shall take appropriate action to prevent further incidents. The ALR shall report the results of its investigation and actions taken, if any, to the Mayor.

(c)

An ALR shall post signs that set forth the reporting requirement of this section conspicuously in the employee and public areas of the ALR.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 509, 47 DCR 2647